tr: Uyumlu Egzersizler: Çeneye kadar barfiks; İnişler; Ters sıra; Diz kaldırma; L oturuş; Bacak kaldırma; Barfiks; Şınav; Split squat; Diğer
hu: Kompatibilis gyakorlatok: Alsó fogású húzódzkodás; Mellizom-gyakorlat; Invertált evezés; Térdemelés; L-ülés; Lábemelés; Felső fogású húzódzkodás; Fekvőtámasz; Egylábas guggolás; Egyéb
zh-TW: 相容運動: 引體向上; 雙槓撐體; 倒排; 屈膝上舉; L-坐; 抬腿; 引體向上; 伏地挺身; 分腿蹲; 其他
fr: Exercices compatibles: Tractions à la barre; Creux; Lignes inversées; Lèves genoux; Sièges en L; Soulèves jambes; Tractions; Pompes; Squats fractionnés; Autre
nl: Compatibele oefeningen: Chin-ups; Dips; Omgekeerde rijen; Knee raises; L-sits; Leg raises; Pull-ups; Pull-ups; Split squats; Andere
en: Compatible exercises: Chin-ups; Dips; Inverted rows; Knee raises; L-sits; Leg raises; Pull-ups; Push-ups; Split squats; Other
sl-SI: Združljive vaje: Zgibi s podprijemom; Horizontalni potiski; Veslanje na drogu; Dvigi kolen; Prednos; Dvigi nog; Zgibi z nadprijemom; Sklece; Razdeljeni počepi; Drugo
pt-BR: Exercícios compatíveis: Barra fixa; Mergulho; Remada invertida; Elevação do joelho; L-sits; Elevação de pernas; Flexões; Push-ups; Agachamento; Outro
it: Esercizi compatibili: Trazioni; Dip; Inverted row; Sollevamento del ginocchio; Sedia; Leg raise; Pull-up; Push-up; Split squat; Altro
ko: 할 수 있는 운동: 친업 턱걸이; 딥스; 인버티드 로우; 니레이즈; L자 앉기; 레그 레이즈; 풀업 턱걸이; 팔굽혀펴기; 스플릿 스쿼트; 기타
ja: 対応エクササイズ: 懸垂; ディップス; 斜め懸垂; ニーレイズ; 脚前挙; レッグレイズ; プルアップ; 腕立て伏せ; スプリットスクワット; その他
es: Ejercicios compatibles: Dominadas de mentón; Fondos; Remo invertido; Elevaciones de rodilla; L-sits; Elevaciones de piernas; Dominadas; Flexiones; Sentadillas divididas; Otros
sk-SK: Kompatibilné cvičenia: Príťah podhmatom; Dipy; Bilaterálne príťahy vlastnej hmotnosti k tyči; Príťahy kolien; L-sedy; Dvíhanie nôh; Zhyby na hrazde; Kliky; Bulharské drepy; Iné
fi: Yhteensopivat harjoitukset: Leuanveto; Dipit; Käänteissoutu; Polvenkohotus; L-istunta; Jalannostot; Leuanvedot; Punnerrukset; Jaetut kyykyt; Muu
bg-BG: Съвместими упражнения: Набирания с тесен хват; Кофички; Обратно гребане; Повдигания на коленете; Изометричен седеж в „L“; Повдигане на краката; Набирания с широк хват; Лицеви опори; Разделени клекове; Други
pl: Zgodne ćwiczenia: Podciąganie z dłońmi do siebie; Dipy; Odwrotne wiosłowanie; Unoszenie kolan; Poziomka; Unoszenie nóg; Podciąganie z dłońmi od siebie; Pompki; Przysiady dzielone; Inne
nb: Kompatible øvelser: Kroppsheving; Dips; Inverted rows; Knehevinger; L-sits; Beinhev; Pullups; Armhevninger; Delte knebøy; Annet
ro-RO: Exerciții compatibile: Tracțiuni cu mâinile spre dvs.; Flotări la bancă pentru triceps; Ramat invers; Ridicare genunchilor la 90 de grade; L-sit; Ridicarea picioarelor la 90 de grade; Tracțiuni; Flotări; Genuflexiuni pe un picior; Altele
vi: Bài tập tương thích: Hít xà đơn; Dip; Nằm đẩy tạ đòn; Nâng gối; Ngồi chữ L; Nâng chân; Kéo xà đơn; Chống đẩy; Squat xuống tấn một chân; Khác
de: Kompatible Übungen: Chin-Ups; Barrenstütze; Umgekehrtes Rudern; Knieheber; L-Sitz; Beinheber; Klimmzüge; Liegestütze; Split Squats; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 适用锻炼: 引体向上; 反屈伸; 反向划船; 抬膝; L 坐; 举腿; 引体上拉; 伏地挺身; 分腿蹲; 其他
el: Συμβατές ασκήσεις: Έλξεις με πρηνή λαβή; Βαθιά καθίσματα; Αντίστροφη κωπηλατική; Άρσεις γονάτων; Έλξεις L; Άρσεις ποδιών; Έλξεις; Πουσάπς; Βαθύ κάθισμα με το ένα πόδι; Άλλο
da: Kompatible øvelser: Siddende mavebøjninger; Dips; Omvendte rækker; Knæløft; L-squats; Benløft; Mavebøjninger; Armbøjninger; Split-squats; Andet
th: การออกกำลังกายที่รองรับ: ดึงข้อแบบ Chin-up; ดิป; ท่า Inverted row; ท่า Knee raise; ท่า L-sit; ท่า Leg raise; ดึงข้อแบบ Pull-up; ดันพื้น; ท่า Split squat; อื่นๆ
sv: Kompatibla övningar: Chin-ups; Dips; Inverterade rader; Knähöjningar; L-sitter; Benlyft; Pull-ups; Armhävningar; Delad knäböj; Övrigt
cs: Kompatibilní cviky: Přítahy k hrazdě; Kliky na bradlech; Obrácené přítahy; Přítahy kolen; Vzpor na rukou s nohama před sebou; Zvedání nohou ve visu; Kliky; Shyby; Výpady s činkou; Jiné
hr-HR: Kompatibilne vježbe: Zgibovi; Propadanje; Obrnuto veslanje; Podizanje koljena; L-sits; Podizanje nogu; Zgibovi; Sklekovi; Podijeljeni čučanj; Ostalo
ru: Поддерживаемые упражнения: Подтягивания; Отжимания; Перевернутые тяги; Подъем колен; Уголок; Подъемы ног; Подтягивания; Отжимания; Раздельные приседания; Другое
pt-PT: Exercícios compatíveis: Barra fixa; Mergulhos; Remada invertida; Elevação de joelhos; L-sits; Elevação de pernas; Elevações; Flexões; Agachamento dividido; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinami pratimai: Prisitraukimai; Atsispaudimai nuo lygiagrečių; Horizontalūs prisitraukimai; Sulenktų kojų kėlimas lygiagretėse; L-sėdėsena („L-sit“); Ištiestų kojų kėlimas; Prisitraukimai; Atsispaudimai; Įtupstai; Kita